Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-314
State Board of Education; members; vacancies; how filled.

Vacancies occurring on the State Board of Education between one general election and another shall be filled by appointment by the Governor from among qualified persons residing in the district in which the vacancy occurs. Such appointments shall be in writing and continue for the unexpired term and until a successor is elected and qualified. The written appointment shall be filed with the Secretary of State.

Laws 1953, c. 320, § 4, p. 1054;

Laws 1957, c. 124, § 24, p. 436;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-324;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 142.